tools/nvda/louis/tables/gurumuki.cti
# when dot 4 is \x0A71 'Addak' in backtranslation
midendword \x0A71\x0A15 4-13 # ADDAK + KA
midendword \x0A71\x0A17 4-1245 # ADDAK + GA
midendword \x0A71\x0A1A 4-14 # ADDAK + CA
always \x0A71\x0A1B 4-16 # ADDAK + CHA
always \x0A71\x0A1C 4-245 # ADDAK + JA
always \x0A71\x0A1D 4-356 # ADDAK + JHA
always \x0A71\x0A1F 4-23456 # ADDAK + TTA
always \x0A71\x0A20 4-2456 # ADDAK + TTHA
always \x0A71\x0A21 4-1246 # ADDAK + DDA
always \x0A71\x0A22 4-123456 # ADDAK + DDHA
always \x0A71\x0A24 4-2345 # ADDAK + TA
always \x0A71\x0A24\x0A4D 4-4-2345 # ADDAK + TA + VIRAMA
midendword \x0A71\x0A25 4-1456 # ADDAK + THA
midendword \x0A71\x0A26 4-145 # ADDAK + DA
always \x0A71\x0A28 4-1345 # ADDAK + NA
always \x0A71\x0A26\x0A3E 4-145-345 # ADDAK + DA + AA
always \x0A71\x0A27 4-2346 # ADDAK + DHA
midendword \x0A71\x0A2A 4-1234 # ADDAK + PA
always \x0A71\x0A2B 4-235 # ADDAK + PHA
always \x0A71\x0A2C 4-12 # ADDAK + BA
midendword \x0A71\x0A2D 4-45 # ADDAK + BHA
endword \x0A71\x0A30 4-1235 # ADDAK + RA
always \x0A71\x0A30\x0A41 4-1235-136 # ADDAK + RA + U
always \x0A71\x0A32 4-123 # ADDAK + LA
always \x0A71\x0A32\x0A4D 4-4-123 # ADDAK + LA + VIRAMA
always \x0A71\x0A38 4-234 # ADDAK + SA
always \x0A71\x0A5C 4-12456 # ADDAK + RRA
always \x0A5C\x0A4D\x0A39 4-12456-125 # RRA + VIRAMA + HA
always \x0A71\x0A5C\x0A4D\x0A39 4-4-12456-125 # ADDAK + RRA + VIRAMA + HA
always \x0A71\x0A16 4-46 # ADDAK + KHA
always \x0A71\x0A26\x0A08 4-145-1-35 # ADDAK + DA + LETTER II


# half characters
always \x0A15\x0A4D 4-13 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KA
always \x0A16\x0A4D 4-24 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHA
always \x0A17\x0A4D 4-1245 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GA
always \x0A18\x0A4D 4-126 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GHA
always \x0A19\x0A4D 4-346 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NGA

always \x0A1A\x0A4D 4-14 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CA
always \x0A1B\x0A4D 4-16 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CHA
always \x0A1C\x0A4D 4-245 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JA
always \x0A1D\x0A4D 4-356 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JHA
always \x0A1E\x0A4D 4-25 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NYA

always \x0A1F\x0A4D 4-23456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTA
always \x0A20\x0A4D 4-2456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTHA
always \x0A21\x0A4D 4-1246 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDA
always \x0A22\x0A4D 4-123456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDHA
always \x0A23\x0A4D 4-3456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NNA

always \x0A24\x0A4D 4-2345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TA
always \x0A25\x0A4D 4-1456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER THA
always \x0A26\x0A4D 4-145 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DA
always \x0A27\x0A4D 4-2346 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DHA
always \x0A28\x0A4D 4-1345 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NA

always \x0A2A\x0A4D 4-1234 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PA
always \x0A2B\x0A4D 4-235 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PHA
always \x0A2C\x0A4D 4-12 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BA
always \x0A2D\x0A4D 4-45 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BHA
always \x0A2E\x0A4D 4-134 # GURUMUKHI LETTER MA

always \x0A2F\x0A4D 4-13456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER YA
always \x0A30\x0A4D 4-1235 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RA
always \x0A32\x0A4D 4-123 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LA
always \x0A33\x0A4D 4-456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LLA = 0A32 AND 0A3C
always \x0A35\x0A4D 4-1236 # GURUMUKHI LETTER VA
always \x0A36\x0A4D 4-146 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SHA - 0A38 AND 0A3C
always \x0A38\x0A4D 4-234 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SA
always \x0A39\x0A4D 4-125 # GURUMUKHI LETTER HA

always \x0A59\x0A4D 4-46 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHHA = 0A16 AND 0A3C
always \x0A5B\x0A4D 4-245 # GURUMUKHI LETTER ZA = 0A1C AND 0A3C
always \x0A5C\x0A4D 4-12456 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RRA
always \x0A5E\x0A4D 4-235 # GURUMUKHI LETTER FA
always \x0A64\x0A4D 4-256 RESERVED- 0964 #DEVANAGARI DANDA
always \x0A65\x0A4D 4-256-256 RESERVED- 0965 # DEVANAGARI DOUBLE DANDA

# To prevent ADDAK in backtranslation
always \x0A26\x0A4D\x0A30 4-145-1235 # DA + VIRAMA + RA
always \x0A28\x0A4D\x0A39 4-1345-125 # NA + VIRAMA + HA
always \x0A32\x0A4D\x0A39 4-123-125 # LA + VIRAMA + HA
always \x0A38\x0A24\x0A4D\x0A30 234-4-2345-1235 # SA + TA + VIRAMA + RA


# consonent followed by vowel letter not matra (vowel sign)

attribute GurumukiVowel \x0A07\x0A08\x0A09\x0A0A\x0A0F\x0A10\x0A13\x0A14
attribute Halant \x0A4D

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A15 13-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A16 24-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A17 1245-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A18 126-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER GHA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A1A 14-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A1B 16-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER CHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A1C 245-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A1D 356-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER JHA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A1F 23456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A20 2456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TTHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A21 1246-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A22 123456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DDHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A23 3456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NNA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A24 2345-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER TA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A25 1456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER THA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A26 145-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A27 2346-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER DHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A28 1345-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER NA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2A 1234-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2B 235-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER PHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2C 12-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2D 45-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER BHA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2E 134-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER MA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A2F 13456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER YA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A30 1235-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A32 123-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A33 456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER LLA = 0A32 AND 0A3C
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A35 1236-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER VA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A36 146-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SHA - 0A38 AND 0A3C
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A38 234-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER SA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A39 125-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER HA

before GurumukiVowel always \x0A59 46-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER KHHA= 0A16 AND 0A3C
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A5B 245-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER ZA = 0A1C AND 0A3C
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A5C 12456-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER RRA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A5E 235-1 # GURUMUKHI LETTER FA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A64 256-1 RESERVED- 0964 #DEVANAGARI DANDA
before GurumukiVowel always \x0A65 256-256-1 RESERVED- 0965 # DEVANAGARI DOUBLE DANDA
